Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin UPPER RED LAKE AND RED LAKE STATE FOREST LAND TRANSFER.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of natural resources must convey to the Red Lake Band of Chippewa Indians for no consideration all state-owned land and real property that the commissioner administers within one mile from the lakeshore of the portion of Upper Red Lake that is in state ownership. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of natural resources must convey to the Red Lake Band of Chippewa Indians for no consideration all state-owned land and real property within the boundaries of the Red Lake State Forest. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of natural resources must identify any funding restrictions or other legal barriers to conveying land and real property according to paragraphs (a) and (b). By January 15, 2026, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources that specifies all identified barriers and gives recommendations for addressing those barriers, including any recommended legislation to eliminate the barriers. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LAND CONVEYANCE.new text end new text begin $20,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated to the commissioner of natural resources for conveying state-owned land and real property according to section 1. Money from this appropriation may be used to acquire any land necessary to facilitate the required conveyance. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2035. new text end